District of Columbia statutes.
28-4513

Cooperation with federal government and states.

Except as provided in section 28-4505(k) , the Corporation Counsel may cooperate with the federal government and the states in the enforcement of this chapter.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
1981 Ed., § 28-4513.